Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Chapter 6 Watershed Districts
69-6-131. Matters to be determined at hearing — Appeal.

At the time and place set for such hearing, or at any subsequent date to which such hearing may be adjourned by order of court, the court shall proceed to hear proof and determine by decree:

The soundness and economic feasibility of the proposed plan or project;

The probable cost of the project;

The benefits to be derived from the proposed project, and whether such benefits are manifestly in the best interest of the lands affected;

Whether these benefits will be conferred generally upon all of the lands of the district, or upon only certain lands in the district, in the latter event the lands calculated to be benefited shall be described as to acreage, boundaries and ownership; and

The recommended method of financing the cost of the project, whether by some general obligation of the district to be defrayed by revenues from the project or work, or by ad valorem tax to be levied by special act of the general assembly upon all of the lands of the district in case all of the lands are benefited generally by such project, or by special assessment against the lands benefited by the proposed improvement.

Any landowner or other interested party aggrieved by the watershed improvement decree of the court has the same right of appeal as provided to any other litigant in the court or to any interested party in connection with any court decree affecting them as provided under the drainage laws of Tennessee, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 21; T.C.A., § 70-1831; T.C.A. §69-7-131.

69-6-132. Revenue bonds.

If the cost of the proposed improvement is to be paid from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the district, the county legislative body may authorize the issuance of the necessary revenue bonds, in accordance with title 9, chapter 21, with respect to a local government.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 22; T.C.A., § 70-1832; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 70; T.C.A. §69-7-132.

69-6-133. Appointment of commissioners.

If the cost of the proposed improvement is to be raised by special assessment upon the lands to be benefited by the project, the court shall appoint three (3) commissioners who shall be disinterested financially in such proposed project.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 23; T.C.A., § 70-1833; T.C.A. §69-7-133.

69-6-134. Report of benefits and costs.

The commissioners shall study the plans for the proposed improvement and the cost of the same. They shall then go upon the lands within the district for the purpose of determining to what extent and in what proportion the lands affected by such project will be benefited accordingly. They will apportion the cost of the proposed project, including the cost of maintenance, for a period of not more than twenty (20) years among the lands benefited; except that maintenance costs shall be provided for throughout the period during which the credit of the district is pledged, or special assessments or taxes levied for the use and benefit of any project.

The commissioners shall report their actions in writing to the court, and in the report they shall set forth in detail their conclusions and findings, listing the lands benefited by the names of their owners, acreage and description and the lump sum assessment for benefits against each tract of land, if such assessment were paid in cash, and also, the amount of the annual assessments required upon each tract, if the cost is to be defrayed by bonds or other obligations of the district for the period of years over which such bonds or obligations are payable. The proposed assessment shall also include interest and other costs in connection with such bonds or obligations.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 23; T.C.A., § 70-1834; T.C.A. §69-7-134.

69-6-135. Hearing on report — Notice — Objections — Decree — Restriction on assessments.

When the commissioners have filed their written report, including the proposed assessment for benefits upon the lands benefited by the project, the court shall set a date for the hearing of the matter upon the report of the commissioners and direct that publication be made for all landowners and other persons interested in the lands to be affected by the proposed improvement in some newspaper of general circulation in each county in which are located lands affected by the proposed improvement. This publication shall be once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the date set for the hearing. The publication shall notify all known landowners and other interested persons generally without being named of the hearing of the report of the commissioners apportioning the cost of the proposed plan, the improvement or project between the lands benefited in proportion to such benefits and setting out the proposed assessments against each tract of land benefited. In addition, the publication should notify such landowners or other interested parties of the time and place of such hearing, when and where they should appear, and show cause why the report of the commissioners should not be approved, and why the assessment should not be levied upon the lands to create the funds necessary for such proposed improvement.

The landowners or other interested persons shall make their appearance and file their objections, if any, in writing on or before the time fixed for such hearing.

At the time and place fixed for such hearing, the court shall proceed to consider the report of the commissioners and any exceptions or objections filed, as well as any proof offered in support of the exceptions or objections or in support of the commissioners' report. Whereupon, the court will sustain or overrule each of the exceptions or modify or amend the proposed assessment to which such exception or objection was filed. The court will then either reject or accept the report of the commissioners and ratify it with or without modifications or amendments in regard to the proposed assessments.

If the court shall accept and ratify the report of the commissioners, either with or without modifications, the court will then by decree proceed to make or levy an assessment for the amount determined upon the respective tracts of land to be benefited by the project in proportion to such benefits; provided, that in watershed districts of a size of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) acres, or larger, no tract of land shall be assessed for such benefits in an amount in excess of twenty-five percent (25%) of its assessed valuation for county taxation.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 23; 1959, ch. 53, § 1; T.C.A, § 70-1835; T.C.A. §69-7-135.

69-6-136. Appeal.

Any person aggrieved may appeal from the decision or the decree of the court in making or levying the assessment or refusing to make or levy the assessment. The appeal is made in the same manner as the appeal of any other case in such court or as provided in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 23; T.C.A., § 70-1836; T.C.A. §69-7-136.

69-6-137. Enforcement of assessments — Issuance of bonds.

The assessment made or levied for watershed improvement shall be a lien on the respective tracts of land upon which it is assessed, and this lien shall be enforced in the same manner as provided for the enforcement of the lien for drainage assessment under chapter 5 of this title, which is incorporated in this section by reference. In no event shall watershed improvement assessment be deemed to be the personal obligations of the landowners.

The court may authorize the issuance of bonds by the district to cover the cost of the project, for the payment of which bonds the assessments upon the lands benefited by the project may be pledged. The terms and conditions of the bonds, as well as their schedule of payment, shall be fixed by the court, but in no event shall the date of the maturity of the final payment under such bond schedule exceed thirty (30) years after the date of issue.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 23; 1969, ch. 258, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-1837; T.C.A. §69-7-137.

69-6-138. Assessment book — Certification to trustees.

As soon as the assessment has been made, the court will fix the date or dates upon which such assessment and/or the annual installments of the same shall be payable. Whereupon, the county clerk shall make out an assessment list or book for the trustee of each county in which are located lands so assessed for benefits, giving alphabetically the name of the owner, the boundaries of each tract, the number of acres in each tract and the amount assessed against each tract, including the annual installments in which such assessments are payable, if the full assessments be not paid in cash. Such book or list shall be in substantially the form used for county tax books. When such lists or books have been completed, the clerk shall certify the same to the trustee or trustees of the counties in which the lands so assessed are located.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 24; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A., § 70-1838; T.C.A. §69-7-138.

Cross-References. Drainage assessment book, §§69-5-813,69-5-926,69-5-1104.

Special assessment book, §7-32-129.

69-6-139. Collection of assessments — Quarterly settlement — Commission.

The trustee of each county in which lands so assessed are located shall collect such assessments upon the dates designated by the court and shall make settlement quarterly with the treasurer of the district for such collections.

The trustee shall be entitled to a commission of one percent (1%) of such collections for such trustee's services.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 25; T.C.A., § 70-1839; T.C.A. §69-7-139.

69-6-140. Delinquent assessments.

In the event assessments become delinquent, §§69-5-817 —69-5-829 shall be applied, and the same are incorporated in this section by reference as fully and completely as if copied.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 26; T.C.A., § 70-1840; T.C.A. §69-7-140.

69-6-141. Treasurer's bond.

In the event of special assessments, the treasurer of the district shall be bonded at the expense of the district by a reputable and responsible corporate surety in an amount determined by the court, or as otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 26; T.C.A., § 70-1841; T.C.A. §69-7-141.

69-6-142. Annual financial review.

The board of directors of each district shall cause an annual financial review of the district's receipts, disbursements, and balances to be made of the books and records of the district. The department of agriculture shall be responsible for determining that the annual financial reviews are made in accordance with procedures prescribed by the department of agriculture.

The annual financial reviews shall be made by representatives appointed by the district's board of directors. If the governing body of the district fails or refuses to have the annual financial review made, then the department of agriculture may appoint a certified public accountant, or direct its department to make the annual financial review, the cost of such review to be paid by the district.

The comptroller of the treasury may require an audit or investigation of a district if the comptroller believes it is necessary to ascertain or correct errors, irregularities, or defaults in the management and disbursement of funds controlled by the district, to be conducted by the department of audit or a certified public accountant approved by the comptroller; provided, that the comptroller or certified public accountant may also charge the district for such an audit.

Each district shall prepare and submit a report regarding the annual financial review of its business affairs and transactions to the department of agriculture, the state soil conservation committee, and the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 27; T.C.A., § 70-1842; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 14; 1993, ch. 271, § 1; T.C.A. §69-7-142; Acts 2012, ch. 573, § 1; 2014, ch. 489, § 1.

Cross-References. Minimum standards for audits, §4-3-304.

69-6-143. Letting of contracts.

A written contract shall be entered into between the board of directors of the district and the successful bidder, after due advertisement for bids as is required in case of contracts for public improvements, in connection with each work plan or project of the district, the cost of which other than rights-of-way and maintenance is to be borne by the district or landowners in the district.

If the project and method of financing have been approved by the court, the contract shall be submitted to and approved by the court prior to the commencement of the plan, improvement, or project.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 28; T.C.A., § 70-1843; T.C.A. §69-7-143.

69-6-144. Ad valorem tax by general assembly.

In addition to the methods of financing authorized in this chapter, administrative costs of the district as well as the cost of any general plan, improvement, project, program or work benefiting all lands in the district generally may be financed by an ad valorem tax levied by special or private acts of the general assembly upon all the lands in the district.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 29; T.C.A., § 70-1844; T.C.A. §69-7-144.

69-6-145. Collection of ad valorem taxes — Commission — Delinquent taxes.

Ad valorem taxes would be collected by the trustee of the county in which the lands are located, in the same manner and at the same time in which other county taxes upon such lands within the watershed district are collected.

The trustee is entitled to a commission of one percent (1%) upon the ad valorem taxes so collected as a commission for such trustee's services. The trustee shall account quarterly to the treasurer of the district for the ad valorem taxes so collected.

Ad valorem taxes are a lien upon the lands embraced in a watershed district as are county taxes and shall be collected by suit in the same manner as other county taxes, if the same are not paid to the trustee in due course. They shall become delinquent at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 29; T.C.A., § 70-1845; T.C.A. §69-7-145.

69-6-146. Right of entry on private property.

The board of directors, its representatives and employees, including engineers and contractors and their employees, have the right and authority to enter upon private lands within or without the boundaries of the district for the purpose of conducting tests, surveys and other work incidental to the preparation of plans, maps, profiles and reports in connection with any work or proposed work of the district, and the district shall be liable for any damages caused by such entry.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 30; T.C.A., § 70-1846; T.C.A. §69-7-146.

69-6-147. Assessments for maintenance.

It is the duty of the board of directors to properly maintain any project constructed and operated within the district.

The board, or landowners owning five percent (5%) of the acreage affected by any project, may petition the court in which such plan or project was approved to levy additional assessments for the proper maintenance or operation, or both, of such project or improvement, as may appear to the court to be necessary, the apportionment of such maintenance expense to be upon the tracts benefited by the original project in the ratio or proportion established in the original assessment roll.

In the case of any improvement or project benefiting all of the lands in the district generally, the court may order the board to have the proper maintenance or repair work, or both, accomplished, and order the same to be paid from the funds of the district in the hands of the treasurer that are not obligated for any other purpose.

A special assessment for maintenance is a lien upon the respective tracts of land and is collected in the same manner as assessments for benefits as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 31; T.C.A., § 70-1847; T.C.A. §69-7-147.

69-6-148. Dissolution of district.

A watershed district may be dissolved in the same way and manner as provided for general welfare and nonprofit corporations as set out in title 48, chapters 51-68. The watershed district shall file a true and correct copy of the dissolution with the state soil conservation committee.

In addition, the watershed district shall be dissolved by operation of law at the expiration of ten (10) years in the event that none of the corporate powers bestowed upon such corporations by this chapter are used. In the event a watershed district is dissolved under this subsection (b), the chair of the state soil conservation committee shall file a notice of dissolution with the secretary of state and upon such filing the watershed district shall no longer be deemed to exist. The chair of the state soil conservation committee shall file a true and correct copy of the notice of dissolution with the register of deeds of the county or counties in which the watershed district is located.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 32; modified; T.C.A., § 70-1848; T.C.A. §69-7-148; Acts 2012, ch. 573, §§ 2, 3.

69-6-149. Provisions supplemental.

This chapter is deemed to be supplemental to existing laws relating to drainage districts, flood control, irrigation, soil conservation, and related matters.

Acts 1955, ch. 112, § 33; T.C.A., § 70-1849; T.C.A. §69-7-149.

69-6-106. Determination of sufficiency — Notice to acting chair.